North Dakota, session 69, HB1413.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new chapter to title 19 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and
enacted as follows:
Safe food donation program - Program participation requirements .
1. The department shall promote a safe food donation program.
2. To donate food under the program, an entity must be licensed under section 23 - 09 - 16 .
3. A charitable organization is not required to have a commercial kitchen or to be certified
by the department to receive food.
4. A charitable organization shall comply with food handling standards set by a local
public health unit.
5. A local public health unit shall:
a. Inspect licensed entities participating in the program;
b. Verify certification of an individual handling food on behalf of a charitable
organization; and
c. Establish safety guidelines and regulate the program.
Protection and liability.
1. A donor operating under this chapter is protected under subsection 2 of section
32 - 03.1 - 02.2, provided the donor is in compliance with established safety guidelines .
2. A charitable organization receiving food shall comply with safety guidelines
established by a local public health unit to protect a recipient's health.
Implementation - Oversight - Funding .
1. The department shall establish:
Page No. 1 25.0780.04000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
a. Inspection procedures; and
b. Educational resources to inform participating entities about safe food donation
practices.
2. The department may establish grant and partnership opportunities to support
participating entities and encourage broad adoption of the safe food donation
program.
Page No. 2 25.0780.04000